Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 5
S

EA OATS

12-5-310. Legislative purpose.

It is the purpose of this part to protect the beaches and shores of the state from erosion by preserving natural vegetative cover to bind the sand of such beaches and shores.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 727, § 1.)

Cross references.

- Wildflower preservation generally,

§

12-6-170

et seq.

Contents of ordinances, resolutions, and other provisions adopted for purpose of governing activities which may result in soil erosion or sedimentation of waters or lands,

§

12-7-6

.

12-5-311. Cutting, harvesting, removing, or eradicating sea oats.

It is unlawful for any person to cut, harvest, remove, or eradicate any of the grass commonly known as sea oats (Uniola paniculata L.) from any public land of this state or from any private land without the consent of the owner of such land or the persons having lawful possession thereof.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 727, § 2.)

12-5-312. Penalty.

Any person violating any provision of this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 727, § 3.)